New York, session 2025-2026, A3357.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 540 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 540. Written acknowledgement of change of membership eligibility. A 4 member intending to initiate or undergo a change of title or employment 5 responsibilities while remaining in the employ of such member's current 6 employer which shall affect such member's eligibility for membership or 7 ability to accrue service credit in the retirement system defined in 8 subdivision one of section five hundred one of this article, and such 9 member's employer shall both execute a written statement provided by the 10 retirement board that such member and such employer acknowledge and 11 understand that such member, on a specific date, will no longer be a 12 member of such retirement system or will no longer be eligible to accrue 13 service credit in such member's retirement plan. Such employer shall, 14 within thirty days after signature by both parties, file such written 15 statement with the retirement board in order to effectuate such change 16 of membership. 17 § 2. The retirement and social security law is amended by adding a new 18 section 113-b to read as follows: 19 § 113-b. Written acknowledgement of change of membership eligibility. 20 A member intending to initiate or undergo a change of title or employ- 21 ment responsibilities while remaining in the employ of such member's 22 current employer which shall affect such member's eligibility for 23 membership or ability to accrue service credit in the retirement system 24 defined in subdivision twenty-eight of section two of this article, and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00371-01-5 A. 3357 2 1 such member's employer shall both execute a written statement provided 2 by the office of the comptroller that such member and such employer 3 acknowledge and understand that such member, on a specific date, will no 4 longer be a member of such retirement system or will no longer be eligi- 5 ble to accrue service credit in such member's retirement plan. Such 6 employer shall, within thirty days after signature by both parties, file 7 such written statement with the office of the comptroller in order to 8 effectuate such change of membership. 9 § 3. The retirement and social security law is amended by adding a new 10 section 411-a to read as follows: 11 § 411-a. Written acknowledgement of change of membership eligibility. 12 A member intending to initiate or undergo a change of title or employ- 13 ment responsibilities while remaining in the employ of such member's 14 current employer which shall affect such member's eligibility for 15 membership or ability to accrue service credit in the retirement system 16 defined in subdivision twenty-eight of section three hundred two of this 17 article, and such member's employer shall both execute a written state- 18 ment provided by the office of the comptroller that such member and 19 such employer acknowledge and understand that such member, on a specific 20 date, will no longer be a member of such retirement system or will no 21 longer be eligible to accrue service credit in such member's retirement 22 plan. Such employer shall, within thirty days after signature by both 23 parties, file such written statement with the office of the comptroller 24 in order to effectuate such change of membership. 25 § 4. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 26 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 27 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 28 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 29 completed on or before such effective date.